apertium-mt-he.he.dix
    <pardef n="קונצ'רט/ו__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואי</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואנו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואכם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואכן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואה</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ואם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אות</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אות</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיי</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותינו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותייך</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיכם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיכן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיהן</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיה</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אותיהם</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="מו/ות__n_m">
      <!-- TODO complete pardef -->
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תי</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תנו</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכם</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכן</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תן</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תו</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תה</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תם</l><r>ות<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="חו/ץ__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ץ</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צנו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צכן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צה</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צות</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צות</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיי</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותינו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותייך</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיכם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיכן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיהן</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיו</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיה</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>צותיהם</l><r>ץ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="קונצ'רטו"><par n="ה"/><i>קונצ'רט</i><par n="קונצ'רט/ו__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חוץ"><par n="ה"/><i>חו</i><par n="חו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניצוץ"><par n="ה"/><i>ניצו</i><par n="חו/ץ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מוות"><par n="ה"/><i>מו</i><par n="מו/ות__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אלמוות"><par n="ה"/><i>אלמו</i><par n="מו/ות__n_m"/></e>
